Georgia, session 2025_26, HB263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
medical assistance generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"49-4-159.5.
(a) The department shall develop and implement a pilot program to provide Medicaid
coverage for doula care for pregnant Medicaid recipients. Such pilot program may provide
reimbursement for up to five doula visits for each pregnant Medicaid recipient, which may
include visits for prepartum care, labor and delivery, and postpartum care.
H. B. 263
- 1 -

LC 46 1042
(b) All doulas participating in the pilot program shall have completed appropriate training,
as determined by the department.
(c) No later than December 31, 2027, the department shall submit a detailed written report
on the implementation and effectiveness of the pilot program to the Governor, the President
of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the
House Committee on Health, the Senate Health and Human Services Committee, the House
Committee on Appropriations, and the Senate Appropriations Committee. Such report
shall include the health outcomes of participants and recommendations on the best process
of reimbursing doulas to promote retention in the perinatal workforce. The report shall also
include recommendations as to expansion of the pilot program state wide.
(d) The pilot program created by this Code section shall terminate on January 1, 2028, and
this Code section shall be repealed by operation of law on such date."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective only upon the effective date of a specific appropriation of
funds for purposes of this Act, as expressed in a line item making specific reference to such
Act in a General Appropriations Act enacted by the General Assembly.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 263
- 2 -